Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5716
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-5716 to 71-5735 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Clean Indoor Air Act.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB118, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB840, § 1.